Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2270.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6108YH (1) 91 sc/ns H.F. 2270 Section 1. Section 8A.202, subsection 1, paragraph j, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 j. Establish and administer standards for public libraries 3 that do not require compliance with or adoption of a policy 4 or standard issued by a private organization unless expressly 5 authorized by statute . 6 Sec. 2. Section 8A.209, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 1. An enrich Iowa program is established in the department 9 to provide direct state assistance to public libraries, to 10 support the open access and interlibrary loan programs, to 11 provide public libraries with an incentive to improve library 12 services that are in compliance with performance measures, 13 and to reduce inequities among communities in the delivery of 14 library services based on performance measures adopted by rule 15 by the department. The department shall adopt rules governing 16 the allocation of moneys appropriated by the general assembly 17 for purposes of this section to provide direct state assistance 18 to eligible public libraries. A public library is eligible for 19 moneys under this subchapter if it is in compliance with the 20 departmentâs performance measures. The department shall not 21 adopt performance measures for public libraries that require 22 compliance with or adoption of a policy or standard issued by a 23 private organization unless expressly authorized by statute. 24